Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.230

Special jurisdiction.

(1) A court of this state lacking jurisdiction under RCW 11.90.220 has special jurisdiction to do any of the following:

(a) Appoint a guardian in an emergency for a term not exceeding sixty days for a respondent who is physically present in this state;

(b) Issue a protective order with respect to real or tangible personal property located in this state if a petition for appointment of a guardian or a conservator for the respondent is pending or has been approved in another state;

(c) Appoint a guardian or conservator for a person under a guardianship, person under a conservatorship, or protected person for whom a provisional order to transfer the proceeding from another state has been issued under procedures similar to RCW 11.90.400.

(2) If a petition for the appointment of a guardian in an emergency is brought in this state and this state was not the respondent's home state on the date the petition was filed, the court shall dismiss the proceeding at the request of the court of the home state, if any, whether dismissal is requested before or after the emergency appointment.

[ 2020 c 312 s 502; 2009 c 81 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.